North Carolina statutes. Chapter 93E. North Carolina Appraisers Act.
Article 1. Real Estate Appraiser.

§ 93E-1-1.
Title.

This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “North Carolina Appraisers Act”.

History.

1993, c. 419, s. 6.

§ 93E-1-2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 482, s. 12.

§ 93E-1-2.1.
Registration, license, or certificate required of real estate appraisers.

It is unlawful for any person in this State to act as a real estate appraiser, to directly or indirectly engage or assume to engage in the business of real estate appraisal, or to advertise or hold himself or herself out as engaging in or conducting the business of real estate appraisal without first obtaining a registration, license, or certificate issued by the Appraisal Board under the provisions of this Chapter. It is also unlawful, with regard to any real property where any portion of that property is located within this State, for any person to perform any of the acts listed above without first being registered, licensed, or certified by the Appraisal Board under the provisions of this Chapter.

History.

1995, c. 482, s. 1; 2001-399, s. 1; 2007-506, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-506, s. 1, effective October 1, 2007, and applicable to applicants for registration, licensure, or certification under this act and to persons whose registration, license, or certification is renewed under this act on or after that date, substituted “It is” for “Beginning October 1, 1995, it shall be” at the beginning of the paragraph and substituted “is also” for “it shall also be” near the middle of the paragraph.

§ 93E-1-3.
When registration, license, or certificate not required.

No trainee registration, license, or certificate shall be issued under the provisions of this Chapter to a partnership, association, corporation, firm, or group. However, nothing herein shall preclude a registered trainee or licensed or certified real estate appraiser from rendering appraisals for or on behalf of a partnership, association, corporation, firm, or group, provided the appraisal report is prepared by a licensed or certified real estate appraiser or by a registered trainee under the immediate personal direction of the certified real estate appraiser and is reviewed and signed by that certified appraiser.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-399, s. 1, effective October 1, 2001.

Nothing in this Chapter shall preclude a real estate broker licensed under Chapter 93A of the General Statutes from performing a broker price opinion or comparative market analysis as defined in

G.S. 93E-1-4

, provided the person does not represent himself or herself as being a registered trainee or a licensed or certified real estate appraiser, and provided they follow the standards set forth in Article 6 of Chapter 93A.

Nothing in this Chapter shall abridge, infringe upon, or otherwise restrict the right to use the term “certified ad valorem tax appraiser” or any similar term by persons certified by the Department of Revenue to perform ad valorem tax appraisals, provided that the term is not used in a manner that creates the impression of certification by the State to perform real estate appraisals other than ad valorem tax appraisals.

Nothing in this Chapter shall entitle a registered trainee or a licensed or certified real estate appraiser to appraise real estate for ad valorem tax purposes unless the person has first been certified by the Department of Revenue pursuant to

G.S. 105-294

.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g) of this section, a trainee registration, license, or certificate is not required under this Chapter for any of the following:

Any person, partnership, association, or corporation that performs appraisals of property owned by that person, partnership, association, or corporation for the sole use of that person, partnership, association, or corporation.

Any court-appointed commissioner who conducts an appraisal pursuant to a judicially ordered evaluation of property.

Any person to qualify as an expert witness for court or administrative agency testimony, if otherwise qualified.

A person who appraises standing timber so long as the appraisal does not include a determination of value of any land.

Any person employed by a lender in the performance of appraisals with respect to which federal regulations do not require a licensed or certified appraiser.

A person who performs ad valorem tax appraisals and is certified by the Department of Revenue under

G.S. 105-294

or

G.S. 105-296

.

A person who prepares a Right-of-Way Claim Report pursuant to G.S. 136-19.6.

Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (f) of this section to the contrary, any person who is registered, licensed, or certified under this Chapter and who performs any of the activities set forth in subdivisions (1) through (5) of subsection (f) of this section must comply with all of the provisions of this Chapter. The provisions of this Chapter shall not apply to certified real estate appraisers who perform a broker price opinion or comparative market analysis pursuant to

G.S. 93E-1-3(c)

, as long as the appraiser is licensed as a real estate broker by the North Carolina Real Estate Commission and does not refer to himself or herself as an appraiser in the broker price opinion or comparative market analysis.

History.

1993, c. 419, s. 6; 1995, c. 482, s. 2; 2001-399, s. 1; 2007-506, s. 2; 2012-163, s. 3; 2013-403, s. 1; 2018-74, s. 1(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-506, s. 2, effective October 1, 2007, and applicable to applicants for registration, licensure, or certification under this act and to persons whose registration, license, or certification is renewed under this act on or after that date, in subsection (a), substituted “trainee or licensed or certified” for “trainee, State-licensed or State-certified” and substituted “licensed or certified” for “State-licensed or State-certified” three times; in subsection (c), deleted “or salesman” following “real estate broker,” substituted “licensed or certified” for “State-licensed or State-certified,” and deleted “or salesperson” following “real estate broker”; substituted “licensed or certified” for “State-licensed or State-certified” in subsection (e).

Session Laws 2012-163, s. 3, effective October 1, 2012, in subsection (c), inserted “broker price opinion or” near the beginning and inserted “and provided they follow the standards set forth in Article 6 of Chapter 93A” at the end of the first sentence and deleted the last sentence, which formerly read: “A real estate broker may perform a comparative market analysis for compensation or other valuable consideration only for prospective or actual brokerage clients or for real property involved in an employee relocation program”; added the last sentence in subdivision (f)(6); and made punctuation changes.

Session Laws 2013-403, s. 1, effective January 1, 2014, in subsection (a), deleted “licensed or” preceding “certified” twice near the end of the subsection, and made a minor stylistic change.

Session Laws 2018-74, s. 1(b), effective July 1, 2018, rewrote the introductory language of subsection (f), made minor, stylistic changes throughout, deleted “however, any” at the end of subdivision (f)(6), and added subdivision (f)(7); added subsection (g) designation; in present subsection (g), added “Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (f) of this section to the contrary, any”, and substituted “subsection (f) of this section” for “this subsection”.

§ 93E-1-3.1.
Prohibited use of title; permissible use of title.

It shall be unlawful for any person to assume or use the title “registered trainee”, “licensed real estate appraiser”, “certified real estate appraiser”, or any title, designation, or abbreviation likely to create the impression of registration, licensure, or certification as a real estate appraiser, unless the person is registered, licensed, or certified by the Appraisal Board in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter. The Board may adopt for the exclusive use of persons licensed or certified under the provisions of this Chapter, a seal, symbol, or other mark identifying the user as a licensed or certified real estate appraiser.

Any person certified as a real estate appraiser by an appraisal trade organization shall retain the right to use the term “certified” or any similar term in identifying the person to the public, provided that:

In each instance wherein the term is used, the name of the certifying organization or body is prominently and conspicuously displayed immediately adjacent to the term; and

The use of the term does not create the impression of certification by the State.

This subsection does not entitle any person certified only by a trade organization to conduct an appraisal that requires a State registration, license, or certification.

The term “registered trainee”, “licensed real estate appraiser”, “certified real estate appraiser”, or any similar term shall not be used following or immediately in connection with the name of a partnership, association, corporation, or other firm or group, or in a manner that might create the impression of registration, licensure, or certification as a real estate appraiser under this Chapter.

History.

1995, c. 482, s. 3; 2001-399, s. 1; 2007-506, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-506, s. 3, effective October 1, 2007, and applicable to applicants for registration, licensure, or certification under this act and to persons whose registration, license, or certification is renewed under this act on or after that date, in subsection (a), substituted “licensed” for “State-licensed,” substituted “certified” for “State-certified,” and substituted “licensed or certified” for “State-licensed or State-certified”; substituted “licensed” for “State-licensed” and substituted “certified” for “State-certified” in subsection (c).

§ 93E-1-4.
Definitions.

When used in this Chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the term:

“Appraisal” or “real estate appraisal” means an analysis, opinion, or conclusion as to the value of identified real estate or specified interests therein performed for compensation or other valuable consideration.

“Appraisal assignment” means an engagement for which an appraiser is employed or retained to act, or would be perceived by third parties or the public as acting, as a disinterested third party in rendering an unbiased appraisal.

“Appraisal Board” or “Board” means the North Carolina Appraisal Board established under

G.S. 93E-1-5

.

“Appraisal Foundation” or “Foundation” means The Appraisal Foundation established on November 20, 1987, as a not-for-profit corporation under the laws of Illinois.

“Appraisal report” means any communication, written or oral, of an appraisal.

“Certificate” means that document issued by the North Carolina Appraisal Board evidencing that the person named therein has satisfied the requirements for certification as a certified real estate appraiser and bearing a certificate number assigned by the Board.

“Certificate holder” means a person certified by the Board under the provisions of this Chapter.

(7a)

“Certified general real estate appraiser” means a person who holds a current, valid certificate as a certified general real estate appraiser issued under the provisions of this Chapter.

(7b)

“Certified residential real estate appraiser” means a person who holds a current, valid certificate as a certified residential real estate appraiser issued under the provisions of this Chapter.

(7c)

“Comparative market analysis” and “broker price opinion” mean an estimate prepared by a licensed real estate broker that details the probable selling price or leasing price of a particular parcel of or interest in property and provides a varying level of detail about the property’s condition, market, and neighborhood, and information on comparable properties, but does not include an automated valuation model.

“License” means that document issued by the North Carolina Appraisal Board evidencing that the person named therein has satisfied the requirements for licensure as a licensed real estate appraiser and bearing a license number assigned by the Board.

(8a)

“Licensed residential real estate appraiser” means a person who holds a current, valid license as a licensed residential real estate appraiser issued under the provisions of this Chapter.

“Licensee” means a person licensed by the Board under the provisions of this Chapter.

“Real estate” or “real property” means land, including the air above and ground below and all appurtenances and improvements thereto, as well as any interest or right inherent in the ownership of land.

“Real estate appraiser” or “appraiser” means a person who for a fee or valuable consideration develops and communicates real estate appraisals or otherwise gives an opinion of the value of real estate or any interest therein.

“Real estate appraising” means the practice of developing and communicating real estate appraisals.

“Residential real estate” means any parcel of real estate, improved or unimproved, that is exclusively residential in nature and that includes or is intended to include a residential structure containing not more than four dwelling units and no other improvements except those which are typical residential improvements that support the residential use for the location and property type. A residential unit in a condominium, town house, or cooperative complex, or planned unit development is considered to be residential real estate.

through (16) Repealed by Session Laws 2007-506, s. 4, effective October 1, 2007.

(17)

“Temporary appraiser licensure or certification” means the issuance of a temporary license or certificate by the Board to a person licensed or certified in another state who enters this State for the purpose of completing a particular appraisal assignment.

(18)

“Trainee”, “registered trainee”, or “trainee real estate appraiser” means a person who holds a current, valid registration as a trainee real estate appraiser issued under the provisions of this Chapter.

(19)

“Trainee registration” or “registration as a trainee” means the document issued by the North Carolina Appraisal Board evidencing that the person named therein has satisfied the requirements of registration as a trainee real estate appraiser and bearing a registration number assigned by the Board.

History.

1993, c. 419, s. 6; 1995, c. 482, s. 4; 2001-399, s. 1; 2007-506, s. 4; 2012-163, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-506, s. 4, effective October 1, 2007, and applicable to applicants for registration, licensure, or certification under this act and to persons whose registration, license, or certification is renewed under this act on or after that date, substituted “certified” for “State-certified” in subdivision (6); added subdivisions (7a) and (7b); redesignated former subdivision (7a) as present subdivision (7c) and deleted “or salesperson” at the end; substituted “licensed” for “State-licensed” in subdivision (8); added subdivision (8a); deleted subdivisions (14) through (16) which defined a State-certified general real estate appraiser, state-certified residential real estate appraiser, and state-licensed residential real estate appraiser.

Session Laws 2012-163, s. 4, effective October 1, 2012, rewrote subdivision (7c).

§ 93E-1-5.
Appraisal Board.

There is created the North Carolina Appraisal Board for the purposes set forth in this Chapter. The Board shall consist of nine members. The Governor shall appoint five members of the Board, and the General Assembly shall appoint four members in accordance with

G.S. 120-121

, two upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and two upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives. Members appointed by the Governor shall be appointed from geographically diverse areas of the State. The appointees recommended by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and four of the appointees of the Governor shall be persons who have been engaged in the business of real estate appraising in this State for at least five years immediately preceding their appointment and are also State-licensed or State-certified real estate appraisers. One of the appointees of the Governor shall be a person representing either the real estate appraisal management industry or the banking industry. No more than three of the appointees may be members of the same appraiser trade organization at any one time. The appointees recommended by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall be a person not involved directly or indirectly in the real estate, real estate appraisal, or the real estate lending industry. Members of the Board shall serve three-year terms, so staggered that the terms of three members expire in one year, the terms of three members expire in the next year, and the terms of three members expire in the third year of each three-year period. The members of the Board shall elect one of their members to serve as chairman of the Board for a term of one year. The Governor may remove any member of the Board appointed by the Governor for misconduct, incompetency, or neglect of duty. The General Assembly may remove any member appointed by it for the same reasons. Successors shall be appointed by the appointing authority making the original appointment. All vacancies occurring on the Board shall be filled, for the unexpired term, by the appointing authority making the original appointment. Vacancies in appointments made by the General Assembly shall be filled in accordance with

G.S. 120-122

. Initial terms of office commenced July 1, 1994.

The Board is an occupational licensing agency governed by Chapter 150B of the General Statutes; its decisions are final agency decisions subject to judicial review under Article 4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

Members of the Board shall be paid the per diem, subsistence, and travel allowances at the rates set forth in

G.S. 93B-5

; provided that none of the expenses of the Board or the compensation or expenses of any officer or employee thereof shall be payable out of the treasury of the State of North Carolina; the total expenses of the administration of this Chapter shall not exceed the total income therefrom; and neither the Board nor any officer or employee thereof shall have any power or authority to make or incur any expense, debt, or other financial obligation binding upon the State of North Carolina.

The Board shall adopt a seal for its use, which shall bear thereon the words “North Carolina Appraisal Board”. Copies of all papers in the office of the Board duly certified and authenticated by the seal of the Board shall be received in evidence in all courts and administrative bodies and with like effect as the originals.

The Board may employ an Executive Director and professional and clerical staff as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this Chapter and to put into effect the rules that the Board may promulgate. The Board shall fix salaries. The Board shall have the authority to issue to its employees credentials or other means of identification.

The Board shall be entitled to the services of the Attorney General in connection with the affairs of the Board or may, in its discretion, employ an attorney to assist or represent it in the enforcement of this Chapter.

The Board may prefer a complaint for violation of this Chapter before any court of competent jurisdiction, and it may take the necessary legal steps through the proper legal offices of the State to enforce the provisions of this Chapter.

The Board shall have the power to acquire, hold, rent, encumber, alienate, and otherwise deal with real property in the same manner as a private person or corporation, subject only to the approval of the Governor and the Council of State. Collateral pledged by the Board for an encumbrance is limited to the assets, income, and revenues of the Board.

The Board may purchase, rent, or lease equipment and supplies and purchase liability insurance or other insurance to cover the activities of the Board, its operations, or its employees.

History.

1993, c. 419, s. 6; 1995, c. 482, s. 5; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 15, s. 16; 2001-399, s. 1; 2008-177, s. 6(a); 2010-141, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-177, s. 6(a), effective August 4, 2008, in subsection (a), substituted “nine members” for “seven members,” “four members” for “two members,” “two upon the recommendation” for “one upon the recommendation” twice, “appointees” for “appointee” twice, and “three members” for “two members” twice.

Session Laws 2010-141, s. 3, effective January 1, 2011, in subsection (a), in the fifth sentence, added “four of,” and added the sixth sentence.

§ 93E-1-6.
Qualifications for registration, licensure, and certification; applications; application fees; examinations.

Any person desiring to be registered as a trainee or to obtain licensure or certification as a licensed or certified real estate appraiser shall make written application to the Board on the forms as are prescribed by the Board setting forth the applicant’s qualifications for registration, licensure, or certification. Each applicant shall satisfy the following qualification requirements:

-(3) Repealed by Session Laws 2019-146, s. 1, effective October 1, 2019, and applicable to registrations, licensures, and certifications issued after that date.

(4)

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-399, s. 1.

(5)

Obtain a high school diploma or its equivalent.

(6)

Successfully complete education, experience, and examination as required by The Appraisal Foundation’s Appraiser Qualifications Board for each level of registration, licensure, or certification.

(7)

Satisfy any additional education or experience requirements that the Board may impose by rule.

Each application for registration as a trainee or for licensure or certification as a real estate appraiser shall be accompanied by a fee of two hundred dollars ($200.00). The applicant shall pay the fee for the required competency examination directly to the private testing service.

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-146, s. 1, effective October 1, 2019, and applicable to registrations, licensures, and certifications issued after that date.

(c1)

The Board shall also make an investigation as it deems necessary into the background of the applicant to determine the applicant’s qualifications with due regard to the paramount interest of the public as to the applicant’s competency, honesty, truthfulness, and integrity. All applicants shall consent to a criminal history record check. Refusal to consent to a criminal history record check may constitute grounds for the Board to deny an application. The Board shall ensure that the State and national criminal history of an applicant is checked. The Board shall be responsible for providing to the North Carolina Department of Public Safety the fingerprints of the applicant to be checked, a form signed by the applicant consenting to the criminal history record check, and the use of fingerprints and other identifying information required by the State or National Repositories of Criminal Histories and any additional information required by the Department of Public Safety in accordance with G.S. 143B-961. The Board shall keep all information obtained pursuant to this section confidential. The Board shall collect any fees required by the Department of Public Safety and shall remit the fees to the Department of Public Safety for expenses associated with conducting the criminal history record check.

(c2)

In addition, the Board may investigate and consider whether the applicant has had any disciplinary action taken against any other professional license in North Carolina or any other state, or if the applicant has committed or done any act which, if committed or done by any real estate trainee or appraiser, would be grounds under the provisions hereinafter set forth for disciplinary action including the suspension or revocation of registration, licensure, or certification, or whether the applicant has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal act. If the results of the investigation shall be satisfactory to the Board, and the applicant is otherwise qualified, then the Board shall issue to the applicant a registration, license, or certificate authorizing the applicant to act as a registered trainee real estate appraiser or licensed or certified real estate appraiser in this State.

If the applicant has not affirmatively demonstrated that the applicant meets the requirements for registration, licensure, or certification, action on the application will be deferred pending a hearing before the Board.

History.

1993, c. 419, s. 6; 1995, c. 482, s. 6; 2001-399, s. 1; 2007-506, ss. 5, 6; 2013-403, s. 2; 2014-100, s. 17.1(mm); 2019-146, s. 1.

§ 93E-1-6.1.
Trainee supervision.

All trainees shall perform all real estate appraisal-related activities under the immediate, active, and personal supervision of a certified real estate appraiser. All appraisal reports must be signed by the appraiser who supervised the trainee. By signing the appraisal report, the appraiser accepts shared responsibility, with the trainee, for the content of and conclusions in the report. All trainees and any appraisers desiring to supervise a trainee shall complete a course in trainee supervision as required in rules adopted by the Board.

History.

2001-399, s. 1; 2007-506, s. 7; 2013-403, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-506, s. 7, effective October 1, 2007, and applicable to applicants for registration, licensure, or certification under this act and to persons whose registration, license, or certification is renewed under this act on or after that date, deleted “State-licensed or State-certified” throughout the section and inserted “licensed or certified” preceding “real estate appraiser.”

Session Laws 2013-403, s. 3, effective January 1, 2014, deleted “licensed or” preceding “certified” in the first sentence; and added the last sentence.

§ 93E-1-7.
Registration, license and certificate renewal; renewal fees; continuing education; reinstatement; replacement registrations, licenses and certificates; registration, licensure, and certification history; address changes.

Trainee registrations, licenses, and certificates issued under this Chapter shall expire on the 30th day of June of every year and shall become invalid after that date unless renewed prior to the expiration date by filing an application with and paying to the Executive Director of the Board the fee of two hundred dollars ($200.00). As a prerequisite to the renewal of a trainee registration or a real estate appraiser license or certificate, the trainee registration holder, the licensee, or the certificate holder must satisfy any continuing education requirements that may be prescribed by the Board under subsection (b) of this section. The members of the General Assembly are exempt from this requirement and any education program regarding trainee supervision during their term of office. The Board may adopt rules establishing a system of trainee registration, license, and certificate renewal in which trainee registrations, licenses, and certificates expire annually with varying expiration dates.

The Board may by rule require, as a prerequisite to trainee registration, license, or certificate renewal, the completion of Board-approved education courses in subject matters determined by the Board, or courses determined by the Board to be equivalent to the instruction, not inconsistent with any requirements of federal authorities.

(b1)

Course sponsors shall pay to the Board a fee of five dollars ($5.00) for each licensee completing an approved continuing education course conducted by the sponsor.

(b2)

The Board shall not charge a course application fee, a course renewal fee, or any other fee for a continuing education course offered by a North Carolina college, university, junior college, or community or technical college accredited by the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools or an agency of the federal, State, or local government.

All trainee registrations, licenses, and certificates reinstated after the expiration dates shall be subject to a late filing fee of ten dollars ($10.00) per month for each month or part thereof that the trainee registration, license, or certificate is lapsed, not to exceed one hundred twenty dollars ($120.00). The late filing fee shall be in addition to the required renewal fee. In the event a trainee, licensee, or certificate holder fails to reinstate the trainee registration, license, or certificate within 12 months after the expiration date thereof, the Board may, in its discretion, consider the person as not having been previously registered, licensed, or certified, and thereby subject to the provisions of this Chapter relating to the issuance of an original trainee registration, license, or certificate, including the examination requirements set forth herein. Applications to reinstate trainee registrations, licenses, or certificates expired for 12 or more months shall be accompanied by the fee required for an original trainee registration, license, or certificate.

Replacement trainee registrations, licenses, and certificates may be issued by the Board upon payment of ten dollars ($10.00) by the trainee, licensee, or certificate holder. Certification by the Board of the trainee registration history or the licensure or certification history of a person registered, licensed, or certified under this Chapter shall be made only after the payment of a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) to the Board.

History.

1993, c. 419, s. 6; 1995, c. 482, s. 7; 2001-399, s. 1; 2006-259, s. 17; 2007-506, s. 8.

§ 93E-1-8.
Education program approval and fees.

The Board may by rule prescribe minimum standards for the approval and renewal of approval of schools and other course sponsors and their instructors to conduct appraiser qualifying courses required by

G.S. 93E-1-6(a)

. Such standards may address subject matter, program structuring, instructional materials, requirements for satisfactory course completion, instructors’ qualifications, and other related matters relevant to the provision of such courses in a manner that best serves the public interest. The standards may require that schools and course sponsors obtain approval for the content of qualifying courses from the Appraiser Qualifications Board of the Appraisal Foundation as part of the application process with the Appraisal Board and pay any fees directly to the Appraiser Qualifications Board as required by the Appraiser Qualifications Board for the approval.

The Board may by rule set nonrefundable fees chargeable to private real estate appraisal schools or course sponsors, including appraisal trade organizations, for the approval and annual renewal of approval of their qualifying courses required by

G.S. 93E-1-6(a)

, or equivalent courses. The fees shall be one hundred dollars ($100.00) per course for approval and fifty dollars ($50.00) per course for renewal of approval. No fees shall be charged for the approval or renewal of approval to conduct appraiser qualifying courses where such courses are offered by a North Carolina college, university, junior college, or community or technical college accredited by the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools, or an agency of the federal, State, or local government.

The Board may by rule prescribe minimum standards for the approval and annual renewal of approval of schools and other course sponsors and their instructors to conduct appraiser continuing education courses. Such standards may address subject matter, instructional materials, requirements for satisfactory course completion, minimum course length, instructors’ qualifications, and other related matters relevant to the provision of such courses in a manner that best serves the public interest.

Nonrefundable fees of one hundred dollars ($100.00) per course may be charged to schools and course sponsors for the approval to conduct appraiser continuing education courses and fifty dollars ($50.00) per course for renewal of approval. However, no fees shall be charged for the approval or renewal of approval to conduct appraiser continuing education courses where such courses are offered by a North Carolina college, university, junior college, or community or technical college accredited by the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools, or by an agency of the federal, State, or local government. A nonrefundable fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) per course may be charged to current or former licensees or certificate holders requesting approval by the Board of a course for continuing education credit when approval of such course has not been previously obtained by the offering school or course sponsor.

History.

1993, c. 419, s. 6; 2007-506, s. 9; 2013-403, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-506, s. 9, effective October 1, 2007, and applicable to applicants for registration, licensure, or certification under this act and to persons whose registration, license, or certification is renewed under this act on or after that date, added the third sentence in subsection (a); in subsection (b), in the second sentence, substituted “The” for “Such” at the beginning, substituted “one hundred dollars ($100.00)” for “forty dollars ($40.00),” deleted “twenty dollars ($20.00) per course for renewal of approval of private school courses, and three hundred dollars ($300.00) per course for approval and” before “fifty dollars” and deleted “for course sponsors, including appraisal trade organizations” at the end.

Session Laws 2013-403, s. 4, effective January 1, 2014, substituted “qualifying courses” for “prelicensing and precertification courses” or similar language everywhere it appears in
subsections (a) and (b).

§ 93E-1-9.
Nonresident licensure and certification.

An applicant from another state may become licensed or certified in North Carolina by conforming to all of the provisions of this Chapter and, in the discretion of the Board, such other terms and conditions as are required of North Carolina residents applying for licensure or certification in such other state.

The Board, in its discretion, may undertake to license or certify on a reciprocal basis, persons licensed or certified in another state if the appraiser licensing and certification program of the other state is in compliance with 12 U.S.C. § 3331, et seq.

The Board may by rule establish a procedure for granting temporary appraiser licensure or certification and may charge an application fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) for temporary appraiser licensure or certification.

Every applicant for State licensure, or certification under this Chapter who is not a resident of this State shall submit with his application an irrevocable consent that service of process in any action against the applicant arising out of the applicant’s activities as a State-licensed or State-certified real estate appraiser may be made by delivery of the process on the Executive Director of the Board.

History.

1993, c. 419, s. 6; 2001-399, s. 1; 2019-146, s. 2.

§ 93E-1-10.
Rule-making authority.

The Board may adopt rules not inconsistent with the provisions of this Chapter and the General Statutes of North Carolina which may be reasonably necessary to implement, administer, and enforce the provisions of this Chapter, including, but not limited to, the authority to:

Prescribe forms and procedures for submitting information to the Board;

Prescribe standards of practice for persons registered as a trainee, licensed or certified under this Chapter; and

Prescribe standards for the operation of real estate appraiser education programs.

History.

1993, c. 419, s. 6; 2001-399, s. 1.

§ 93E-1-11.
Register of applicants; roster of trainees, State-licensed and State-certified appraisers; financial report to Secretary of State; administrative expenses.

The Executive Director of the Board shall keep a register of all applicants for State trainee registration or for State licensure or certification as real estate appraisers, showing for each the date of application, name, business or residence address, and whether the registration, license or certificate was granted or refused. The register shall be prima facie evidence of all matters received therein.

The Executive Director of the Board shall also keep a current roster showing the names and places of business of all registered trainees and State-licensed and State-certified real estate appraisers, which roster shall be kept on file in the office of the Board and be open to public inspection.

On or before the first day of November of each year, the Board shall file with the Secretary of State a copy of the roster of registered trainees and real estate appraisers licensed or certified by the Board and a report containing a complete statement of income received by the Board in connection with the trainee registration and the licensure and certification of real estate trainees and appraisers for the preceding fiscal year ending June 30th, attested by the affidavit of the Executive Director of the Board.

In addition to those fees prescribed in this Chapter for making application for and renewing trainee registrations, appraiser licenses, and certificates, the Board may collect from applicants and holders of the licenses and certificates and remit to the appropriate agency or instrumentality of the federal government any additional fees as may be required to render North Carolina State-licensed or State-certified appraisers eligible to perform appraisals in connection with federally related transactions as well as an additional fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) to cover the administrative costs associated therewith.

History.

1993, c. 419, s. 6; 1995, c. 482, s. 8; 2001-399, s. 1.